Florida, session 2026, HB747.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (6) of
section 943.059, Florida Statutes, are reenacted, and a new
paragraph (e) is added to that subsection, to read:
943.059 Court-ordered sealing of criminal history
records.—
(6) EFFECT OF ORDER.—
(a) A criminal history record of a minor or an adult which
is ordered sealed by a court pursuant to this section is
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I
of the State Constitution and is available only to the following
persons:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb747-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 747 2026
1. The subject of the record;
2. The subject's attorney;
3. Criminal justice agencies for their respective criminal
justice purposes, which include conducting a criminal history
background check for approval of firearms purchases or transfers
as authorized by state or federal law;
4. Judges in the state courts system for the purpose of
assisting them in their case-related decisionmaking
responsibilities, as set forth in s. 943.053(5); or
5. To those entities set forth in subparagraphs (b)1., 4.-
6., and 8.-10. for their respective licensing access
authorization and employment purposes.
(d) Information relating to the existence of a sealed
criminal history record provided in accordance with paragraph
(b) is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
Art. I of the State Constitution, except that the department
shall disclose the sealed criminal history record to the
entities set forth in subparagraphs (b)1., 4.-6., and 8.-10. for
their respective licensing, access authorization, and employment
purposes. An employee of an entity set forth in subparagraph
(b)1., subparagraph (b)4., subparagraph (b)5., subparagraph
(b)6., subparagraph (b)8., subparagraph (b)9., or subparagraph
(b)10. may not disclose information relating to the existence of
a sealed criminal history record of a person seeking employment,
access authorization, or licensure with such entity or
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb747-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 747 2026
contractor, except to the person to whom the criminal history
record relates or to persons having direct responsibility for
employment, access authorization, or licensure decisions. A
person who violates this paragraph commits a misdemeanor of the
first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
775.083.
(e) The expansion of the public records exemption under
this subsection to include criminal history records described in
subparagraph (1)(b)2. is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature. If the expansion of the
exemption is not saved from repeal, this subsection shall revert
to that in existence on June 30, 2026, except that any
amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall be
preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
expire pursuant to this paragraph.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that a criminal history record described in s.
943.059(1)(b)2. which is sealed be made confidential and exempt
from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution, and only be made available in accordance with the
provisions of s. 943.059(6). If a sealed criminal history record
remains accessible to potential employers, landlords, and other
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb747-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 747 2026
members of the public, the person who obtained the sealing of
the record faces barriers to obtaining work, housing, or other
resources necessary to be a productive member of society.
Increasing opportunities for persons to seal a criminal history
record promotes economic stability, reduces crime and
recidivism, and makes communities safer. For these reasons, the
Legislature finds that it is a public necessity that the
criminal history record of persons adjudicated guilty of certain
nonviolent misdemeanor offenses be confidential and exempt from
public records requirements.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 745 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb747-00